Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1222
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for credentialing activities under the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 129;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5181.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 506.